Louisiana, session 2026, SB492.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 31:149(I) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§149. Mineral rights reserved from acquisitions of land by governments or agencies
thereof imprescriptible; prescriptive period in acquisitions for
economic development
* * *
I. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, When when
land is acquired from any person by an acquiring authority or other person, through
act of sale, exchange, donation, or other contract, as part of an economic
development project pursuant to a cooperative endeavor agreement between the
acquiring authority and the state through Louisiana Economic Development, as
evidenced in a certification by the secretary of Louisiana Economic Development
attached to the instrument by which the land is acquired, and a mineral right subject
to the prescription of nonuse is reserved in the instrument by which the land is
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1082 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 492
acquired, the prescription of nonuse shall be for a period of twenty years from the
date of acquisition whether the title to the land remains in the acquiring authority or
is subsequently transferred to a third person, public or private thereafter not run
against the right whether the title to the land remains in the acquiring
authority, or is subsequently transferred to a third person, public or private.
(2) The certification by the secretary of Louisiana Economic
Development shall constitute a determination that the acquisition serves a
public purpose for economic development.